Illinois, session 104th, HB1113.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Sections 510-22.34d and 34-18.88 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.34d new)7    Sec. 10-22.34d. School chaplains. 8    (a) Each school board may employ or accept as a volunteer a 9certified chaplain to provide to a school support, services, 10and programs for students, staff, and parents as assigned by 11the school board. The chaplain shall be selected by and be 12responsible to the school board.13    (b) Any chaplain employed or accepted as a volunteer under 14this Section is not required to be certified by the State Board 15of Education.16    (c) Nothing in this Section prohibits any school board 17from employing or accepting as a volunteer more than one 18chaplain for any school.19    (d) A school board that employs or accepts as a volunteer a 20chaplain under this Section shall ensure that the chaplain 21submits to a fingerprint-based criminal history records check 22and check of the Statewide Sex Offender Database and Statewide 23Murderer and Violent Offender Against Youth Database as   HB1113- 2 -LRB104 03913 LNS 13937 b1provided in Section 10-21.9 of this Code before the chaplain 2begins employment or volunteering at a school.3    (e) A school board may not employ or accept as a volunteer 4a chaplain who has registered or is required to register under 5the Statewide Sex Offender Registration Act or Statewide 6Murderer and Violent Offender Against Youth Registration Act.7    (f) No person shall have a cause of action against a 8chaplain employed or accepted as a volunteer under this 9Section for any action taken or statement made by the chaplain 10in adherence with the provision of support, services, or 11programs for students, staff, or parents. However, this 12immunity does not apply to any action or statement by a 13chaplain that was maliciously, willfully, and deliberately 14intended to cause harm or harass or to intimidate those 15seeking support, services, or programs. 16    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.88 new)17    Sec. 34-18.88. School chaplains. 18    (a) The board may employ or accept as a volunteer a 19certified chaplain to provide to a school support, services, 20and programs for students, staff, and parents as assigned by 21the board. The chaplain shall be selected by and be 22responsible to the board.23    (b) Any chaplain employed or accepted as a volunteer under 24this Section is not required to be certified by the State Board 25of Education.  HB1113- 3 -LRB104 03913 LNS 13937 b1    (c) Nothing in this Section prohibits the board from 2employing or accepting as a volunteer more than one chaplain 3for any school.4    (d) If the board employs or accepts as a volunteer a 5chaplain under this Section, the board shall ensure that the 6chaplain submits to a fingerprint-based criminal history 7records check and check of the Statewide Sex Offender Database 8and Statewide Murderer and Violent Offender Against Youth 9Database as provided in Section 34-18.5 of this Code before 10the chaplain begins employment or volunteering at a school.11    (e) The board may not employ or accept as a volunteer a 12chaplain who has registered or is required to register under 13the Statewide Sex Offender Registration Act or Statewide 14Murderer and Violent Offender Against Youth Registration Act.15    (f) No person shall have a cause of action against a 16chaplain employed or accepted as a volunteer under this 17Section for any action taken or statement made by the chaplain 18in adherence with the provision of support, services, or 19programs for students, staff, or parents. However, this 20immunity does not apply to any action or statement by a 21chaplain that was maliciously, willfully, and deliberately 22intended to cause harm or harass or to intimidate those 23seeking support, services, or programs.